Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-1022
Firefighter; prior service; how treated.

A firefighter shall be credited with all years of his or her service after August 7, 1965, for the purpose of determining vested retirement benefits under sections 16-1020 to 16-1038.

Laws 1983, LB 531, § 3.